Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3522
Act; application and construction.

The Nebraska Uniform Custodial Trust Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 22.